Mississippi statutes. Title 31. Public Business, Bonds and Obligations
Revenue-Producing Projects
[Repealed]

§§ 31-11-51 through 31-11-89.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 37, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§31-11-51. [Codes, 1942, § 9023-22; Laws, 1956, ch. 280, § 2]

§31-11-53. [Codes, 1942, § 9023-23; Laws, 1956, ch. 280, § 3; Laws, 1962, ch. 507, § 1]

§31-11-55. [Codes, 1942, § 9023-24; Laws, 1956, ch. 280, § 4]

§31-11-57. [Codes, 1942, § 9023-25; Laws, 1956, ch. 280, § 5]

§31-11-59. [Codes, 1942, § 9023-26; Laws, 1956, ch. 280, § 6]

§31-11-61. [Codes, 1942, § 9023-27; Laws, 1956, ch. 280, § 7]

§31-11-63. [Codes, 1942, § 9023-28; Laws, 1956, ch. 280, § 8]

§31-11-65. [Codes, 1942, § 9023-29; Laws, 1956, ch. 280, § 9]

§31-11-67. [Codes, 1942, § 9023-30; Laws, 1956, ch. 280, § 10]

§31-11-69. [Codes, 1942, § 9023-31; Laws, 1956, ch. 280, § 11]

§31-11-71. [Codes, 1942, § 9023-32; Laws, 1956, ch. 280, § 12]

§31-11-73. [Codes, 1942, § 9023-33; Laws, 1956, ch. 280, § 13]

§31-11-75. [Codes, 1942, § 9023-34; Laws, 1956, ch. 280, § 14]

§31-11-77. [Codes, 1942, § 9023-35; Laws, 1956, ch. 280, § 15]

§31-11-79. [Codes, 1942, § 9023-36; Laws, 1956, ch. 280, § 16]

§31-11-81. [Codes, 1942, § 9023-37; Laws, 1956, ch. 280, § 17]

§31-11-83. [Codes, 1942, § 9023-38; Laws, 1956, ch. 280, § 18]

§31-11-85. [Codes, 1942, § 9023-39; Laws, 1956, ch. 280, § 19]

§31-11-87. [Codes, 1942, § 9023-40; Laws, 1956, ch. 280, § 20]